Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-5,124
Authorized agency; information; release; to whom.

The authorized agency provided with information pursuant to section 81-5,121 or 81-5,123 and in furtherance of its own purposes may release or provide such information to any of the other authorized agencies.

Laws 1979, LB 301, § 10.